Arkansas, session 2025, SB267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 10, Subchapter 9, is
repealed.
Subchapter 9 — Arkansas Alternative Motor Fuel Development Act

15-10-901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas
Alternative Motor Fuel Development Act”.

15-10-902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Compressed natural gas” means compressed natural gas that
is to be delivered to a motor vehicle at a pressure of at least three
thousand pounds per square inch (3,000 psi);
(2) “Compressed natural gas refueling station” means property
that:
(A) Is directly related to the delivery of compressed
*CRH102*
02-25-2025 10:13:13 CRH102

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 SB267
natural gas into the fuel tank of a licensed motor vehicle, including without
limitation the compression equipment, storage vessels, quality control
equipment, and dispensers for compressed natural gas;
(B) Is available to the public twenty-four (24) hours each
day;
(C) Is metered on a gasoline gallon equivalent basis; and
(D) Contains a credit card reader that allows for the use
of a credit card or debit card to purchase the compressed natural gas;
(3) “Diesel gallon equivalent” means six and twenty-two
hundredths pounds (6.22 lbs.) of liquefied natural gas;
(4) “Electric vehicle” means a plug-in electric drive motor
vehicle that is propelled by one (1) or more electric motors using electrical
energy stored in rechargeable batteries or other energy storage devices;
(5) “Gasoline gallon equivalent” means five and sixty-six
hundredths pounds (5.66 lbs.) of compressed natural gas or one hundred
twenty-six and sixty-seven hundredths cubic feet (126.67 cu. ft.) of natural
gas;
(6) “Liquefied natural gas” means natural gas that is super-
cooled into a liquid fuel that is used primarily in medium-duty and heavy-
duty vehicles;
(7) “Liquefied natural gas refueling station” means property
that:
(A) Is directly related to the delivery of liquefied
natural gas into the fuel tank of a licensed motor vehicle, including without
limitation the compression equipment, refrigeration equipment, storage
vessels, and dispensers for liquefied natural gas;
(B) Is available to the public twenty-four (24) hours each
day;
(C) Is metered on a diesel gallon equivalent basis; and
(D) Contains a credit card reader that allows for the use
of a credit card or debit card to purchase the liquefied natural gas;
(8)(A) “Liquefied petroleum gas” means gas derived from
petroleum or natural gas that is:
(i) In a gaseous state at normal atmospheric
temperature and pressure but may be maintained in a liquid state at normal
atmospheric temperature by the application of sufficient pressure; and
02-25-2025 10:13:13 CRH102

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 SB267
(ii) Normally stored as a liquid under pressure.
(B) “Liquefied petroleum gas” does not include pentane,
gasoline, or oil;
(9) “Liquefied petroleum gas refueling station” means property
that:
(A) Is directly related to the delivery of liquefied
petroleum gas into the fuel tank of a licensed motor vehicle, including
without limitation the compression equipment, storage vessels, and dispensers
for liquefied petroleum gas;
(B) Is available to the public twenty-four (24) hours each
day;
(C) Is metered on a gasoline gallon equivalent basis; and
(D) Contains a credit card reader that allows for the use
of a credit card or debit card to purchase the liquefied petroleum gas;
(10) “Motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle licensed under the
laws of this state or another state that was originally designed by the
manufacturer to operate lawfully and principally on highways, roads, and
streets;
(11) “Private electric vehicle charging station” means a
charging station of two hundred forty volts (240 V) or less that is purchased
for private use and supplies electricity for charging one (1) or more
electric vehicles;
(12) “Public electric vehicle charging station” means a charging
station of two hundred forty volts (240 V) or more that:
(A) Supplies electricity for charging one (1) or more
electric vehicles;
(B) Is available to the public twenty-four (24) hours a
day; and
(C) Contains a credit card reader that allows for the use
of a credit card or debit card to purchase electricity;
(13) “Qualified alternative motor vehicle fuel” means
electricity, a hydrogen fuel cell, compressed natural gas, liquefied natural
gas, or liquefied petroleum gas; and
(14) “Qualified alternative motor vehicle property” means:
(A) New equipment that:
(i) Is installed:
02-25-2025 10:13:13 CRH102

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 SB267
(a) By a certified mechanic;
(b) On a motor vehicle with a model year that
is no older than one (1) model year older than the current year; and
(c) To convert a motor vehicle propelled by
gasoline or diesel fuel to be propelled by a qualified alternative motor
vehicle fuel;
(ii) Is approved by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency under 40 C.F.R. Part 85 Subpart F, 40 C.F.R. § 85.501 et
seq., and 40 C.F.R. Part 86 Subpart S, 40 C.F.R. § 86.1801-01 et seq.; and
(iii) Has not been used to modify or retrofit any
other motor vehicle propelled by gasoline or diesel fuel;
(B) The portion of the basis of a motor vehicle with a
model year that is no older than one (1) model year older than the current
year and that was originally equipped to be propelled by a qualified
alternative motor vehicle fuel that is attributable to the:
(i) Storage of the qualified alternative motor
vehicle fuel;
(ii) Delivery of the qualified alternative motor
vehicle fuel to the motor vehicle's engine; and
(iii) Exhaust of gases from the combustion of the
qualified alternative motor vehicle fuel; or
(C) New property that:
(i) Is directly related to the:
(a) Compression and delivery of natural gas
from a private home or residence for noncommercial purposes into the fuel
tank of a motor vehicle propelled by compressed natural gas; or
(b) Delivery of electricity from a private
home or residence for noncommercial purposes into a motor vehicle propelled
by electricity; and
(ii) Has not been previously installed or used at
another location to refuel motor vehicles powered by natural gas or
electricity.

15-10-903. Rebate for refueling stations.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental
Quality may offer a rebate for each approved private electric vehicle
02-25-2025 10:13:13 CRH102

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 SB267
charging station, public electric vehicle charging station, compressed
natural gas refueling station, liquefied natural gas refueling station, and
liquefied petroleum gas refueling station that is:
(A) Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the
qualifying costs of the compressed natural gas refueling station, liquefied
natural gas refueling station, or liquefied petroleum gas refueling station,
not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000);
(B) Not more than fifty percent (50%) of the eligible
equipment purchase and installation cost of the private electric vehicle
charging station, not to exceed nine hundred dollars ($900); or
(C) Not more than fifty percent (50%) of the eligible
equipment purchase and installation cost of the public electric vehicle
charging station, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(2) The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may
increase the rebate percentages listed under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section if the increase is designated or authorized by a funding source
approved by a federal settlement or state settlement.
(b) A rebate offered under this section does not apply to any of the
following:
(1) The cost of land for the private electric vehicle charging
station, public electric vehicle charging station, compressed natural gas
refueling station, liquefied natural gas refueling station, or liquefied
petroleum gas refueling station;
(2) The cost of any buildings for the private electric vehicle
charging station, public electric vehicle charging station, compressed
natural gas refueling station, liquefied natural gas refueling station, or
liquefied petroleum gas refueling station; and
(3) Any costs not directly associated with the compression,
storage, or dispensing of compressed natural gas, or the storage and
dispensing of liquefied natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas, or the
dispensing of electricity.
(c) To be eligible for a rebate under this section, a person or entity
shall complete and submit an application for the rebate on the forms
prescribed by the office.
(d) The office shall ensure that the following criteria are met before
providing a rebate under this section:
02-25-2025 10:13:13 CRH102

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 SB267
(1) The applicant is registered as a business entity in good
standing with the Secretary of State;
(2) The dispenser at the compressed natural gas refueling
station, liquefied natural gas refueling station, or liquefied petroleum gas
refueling station has been inspected and certified by the State Division of
Weights and Measures of the Arkansas Bureau of Standards of the State Plant
Board or a registered service agency of the division;
(3) The dispenser at the private electric vehicle charging
station or public electric vehicle charging station has been inspected and is
in compliance with the rules promulgated by the office and any other
applicable laws;
(4) The applicant for a rebate on a compressed natural gas
refueling station, liquefied natural gas refueling station, or liquefied
petroleum gas refueling station meets the siting requirements stated in the
National Fire Protection Association's NFPA 52: Vehicular Natural Gas Fuel
Systems Code, 2016 Edition; and
(5) The applicant for a rebate on a private electric vehicle
charging station or public electric vehicle charging station meets the siting
requirements stated in the National Fire Protection Association's NFPA 70:
National Electrical Code, 2017 Edition.

15-10-904. Rebates for qualified alternative motor vehicle property.
(a) The Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental
Quality may offer a rebate for qualified alternative motor vehicle property
that is:
(1) Not more than fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the
qualified alternative motor vehicle property, not to exceed four thousand
five hundred dollars ($4,500) for each motor vehicle that is powered by
hydrogen fuel cell, compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or
liquefied petroleum gas; and
(2) Not more than fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the
qualified alternative motor vehicle property, not to exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500) for each qualified alternative motor vehicle
property that is powered by electricity.
(b) The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may increase
the rebate percentages listed under subsection (a) of this section if the
02-25-2025 10:13:13 CRH102

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 SB267
increase is designated or authorized by a funding source approved by a
federal settlement or state settlement.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1249 is repealed.
19-5-1249. Alternative Motor Fuel Development Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Alternative Motor Fuel Development Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Grants made by a person, entity, or federal government
agency;
(2) Other funds that become available through energy programs;
(3) Any remaining fund balances carried forward from year to
year; and
(4) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Environmental Quality to
provide rebates and incentives under the Arkansas Alternative Motor Fuel
Development Act, § 15-10-901 et seq.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

/s/Irvin













02-25-2025 10:13:13 CRH102